Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2035.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of August 11, 1967 (P.L.205, No.69), entitled "An act to validate conveyances and other instruments which have been defectively acknowledged," is amended to read:Section 1. No grant, bargain and sale, feoffment, deed of conveyance, release, assignment, mortgage or other assurance of lands, tenements and hereditaments, whatsoever, bearing date prior to the year two thousand [thirteen] twenty, made, executed and delivered by husband and wife, or by any person or trustee or attorney in fact for any other person or persons, to a bona fide purchaser or purchasers for a valuable consideration, and acknowledged before any officer duly authorized by law to take such acknowledgment, shall be deemed, held or adjudged invalid 12345678910111213141516171819 or defective or insufficient in law by reason of any informality or defect in such acknowledgment as not being made according to law, or because the date of the acknowledgment predates the date of the instrument, or by reason of the acknowledgment thereto having been made by any trustee or attorney in fact in his individual capacity instead of as such trustee or attorney in fact; but all and every such grant, bargain and sale, feoffment, deed of conveyance, release, assignment, mortgage or other assurance, so made, executed and acknowledged, as aforesaid, shall be as good, valid and effectual in law for transferring, passing and conveying the estate, right, title and interest of such husband and wife of, in and to the lands, tenements and hereditaments mentioned in the same, as if all the requisites and particulars of such acknowledgment had been made according to law, and as if such trustee or attorney in fact had made the acknowledgment thereto in such capacity; and the record of the same duly made in the proper office for recording of deeds in this Commonwealth, and exemplifications of the same duly certified, shall be legal evidence in all cases in which the original would be competent evidence.Section 2. The amendment of section 1 of the act shall not apply to lawsuits pending on the effective date of this section and which are undetermined.Section 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or in 60 days, whichever is later.20250HB2035PN2605 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425